Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.110

Employee authorization of membership dues and other payments—Revocation.

(1) Upon the authorization of an employee within the bargaining unit and after the certification or recognition of the bargaining unit's exclusive bargaining representative, the employer shall deduct from the payments to the employee the monthly amount of dues as certified by the secretary of the exclusive bargaining representative and shall transmit the same to the treasurer of the exclusive bargaining representative.

(2)(a) An employee's written, electronic, or recorded voice authorization to have the employer deduct membership dues from the employee's salary must be made by the employee to the exclusive bargaining representative. If the employer receives a request for authorization of deductions, the employer shall as soon as practicable forward the request to the exclusive bargaining representative.

(b) Upon receiving notice of the employee's authorization from the exclusive bargaining representative, the employer shall deduct from the employee's salary membership dues and remit the amounts to the exclusive bargaining representative.

(c) The employee's authorization remains in effect until expressly revoked by the employee in accordance with the terms and conditions of the authorization.

(3)(a) An employee's request to revoke authorization for payroll deductions must be in writing and submitted by the employee to the exclusive bargaining representative in accordance with the terms and conditions of the authorization.

(b) After the employer receives confirmation from the exclusive bargaining representative that the employee has revoked authorization for deductions, the employer shall end the deduction no later than the second payroll after receipt of the confirmation.

(4) The employer shall rely on information provided by the exclusive bargaining representative regarding the authorization and revocation of deductions.

(5) If the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit enter into a collective bargaining agreement that includes requirements for deductions of other payments, the employer must make such deductions upon authorization of the employee.

[ 2019 c 230 s 9; 2018 c 247 s 2; 1973 c 59 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 11.]